Utah statutes.
20A-7-212.   Effective date.

(1)  A proposed law submitted to the Legislature by initiative petition and enacted by them takes effect 60 days after the final adjournment of the session of the Legislature that passed it, unless a different effective date is included in the proposed law and the proposed law passes the Legislature by a two-thirds vote of the members elected to each house of the Legislature.

(2) (a)  Any proposed law submitted to the people by initiative petition that is approved by the voters at any election does not take effect until at least five days after the date of the official proclamation of the vote by the governor.

(b)  Any act or law submitted to the people by initiative that is approved by the voters at any election takes effect on the date specified in the initiative petition.

(c)  If the initiative petition does not specify an effective date, a law approved by the voters at any election takes effect five days after the date of the official proclamation of the vote by the governor.

(3) (a)  The governor may not veto a law adopted by the people.

(b)  The Legislature may amend any initiative approved by the people at any legislative session.

